Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 28. Abuse, Neglect, and Exploitation of Vulnerable Adults

§ 1375.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Bodily injury” means physical pain, illness, or any impairment of physical condition.

“Caregiver” means:

a person, agency, facility, or other organization with responsibility for providing subsistence, health, or other care to a vulnerable adult, who has assumed the responsibility voluntarily, by contract, or by an order of the court; or

a person providing care, including health care, custodial care, personal care, mental health services, rehabilitative services, or any other kind of care that is required because of another’s age or disability.

“Lewd and lascivious conduct” means any lewd or lascivious act upon or with the body, or any part or member thereof, of a vulnerable adult, with the intent of arousing, appealing to, or gratifying the lust, passions, or sexual desires of the person or the vulnerable adult.

“Neglect” means intentional or reckless failure or omission by a caregiver to:

provide care or arrange for goods, services, or living conditions necessary to maintain the health or safety of a vulnerable adult, including, but not limited to, food, clothing, medicine, shelter, supervision, and medical services, unless the caregiver is acting pursuant to the wishes of the vulnerable adult or his or her representative, or an advanced directive as defined in 18 V.S.A. chapter 111; or
(A) (i) provide care or arrange for goods, services, or living conditions necessary to maintain the health or safety of a vulnerable adult, including, but not limited to, food, clothing, medicine, shelter, supervision, and medical services, unless the caregiver is acting pursuant to the wishes of the vulnerable adult or his or her representative, or an advanced directive as defined in 18 V.S.A. chapter 111; or

make a reasonable effort, in accordance with the authority granted the caregiver, to protect a vulnerable adult from abuse, neglect, or exploitation by others.

Neglect may be repeated conduct or a single incident that has resulted in or could be expected to result in physical or psychological harm, as a result of subdivisions (A)(i) or (ii) of this subdivision (4).

“Serious bodily injury” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision 1021(2) of this title.

“Sexual act” means conduct between persons consisting of contact between the penis and the vulva, the penis and the anus, the mouth and the penis, the mouth and the vulva, or any intrusion, however slight, by any part of a person’s body or any object into the genital or anal opening of another.

“Sexual activity” means a sexual act, other than appropriate health care or personal hygiene, or lewd and lascivious conduct.

“Vulnerable adult” means any person 18 years of age or older who:

is a resident of a facility required to be licensed under 33 V.S.A. chapter 71;

is a resident of a psychiatric hospital or a psychiatric unit of a hospital;

has been receiving personal care and services from an agency certified by the Vermont Department of Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living or from a person or organization that offers, provides, or arranges for personal care; or

regardless of residence or whether any type of service is received, is impaired due to brain damage, infirmities of aging, or a physical, mental, or developmental disability that results in some impairment of the individual’s ability to:

provide for his or her own care without assistance, including the provision of food, shelter, clothing, health care, supervision, or management of finances; or

protect himself or herself from abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 79, § 2; amended 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 26, 2006.

§ 1376.
Abuse.

A person who engages in conduct with an intent or reckless disregard that the conduct is likely to cause unnecessary harm, unnecessary pain, or unnecessary suffering to a vulnerable adult shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

A person who commits an assault, as defined in section 1023 of this title, with actual or constructive knowledge that the victim is a vulnerable adult, shall be imprisoned for not more than two years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.

A person who commits an aggravated assault as defined in subdivision 1024(a)(1) or (2) of this title with actual or constructive knowledge that the victim is a vulnerable adult shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 79, § 2.

§ 1377.
Abuse by unlawful restraint and unlawful confinement.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person shall knowingly or recklessly:

cause or threaten to cause unnecessary or unlawful confinement or unnecessary or unlawful restraint of a vulnerable adult; or

administer or threaten to administer a drug, a substance, or electroconvulsive therapy to a vulnerable adult.

This section shall not apply if the confinement, restraint, administration, or threat is:

part of a legitimate and lawful medical or therapeutic treatment; or

lawful and reasonably necessary to protect the safety of the vulnerable adult or others, provided that less intrusive alternatives have been attempted if doing so would be reasonable under the circumstances.

A person who violates this section shall:

be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

if the violation causes bodily injury, be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

if the violation causes serious bodily injury, be imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 79, § 2.

§ 1378.
Neglect.

A caregiver who intentionally or recklessly neglects a vulnerable adult shall be imprisoned not more than 18 months or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

A caregiver who violates subsection (a) of this section, and as a result of such neglect, serious bodily injury occurs to the vulnerable adult, shall be imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 79, § 2.

§ 1379.
Sexual abuse.

A person who volunteers for or is paid by a caregiving facility or program shall not engage in any sexual activity with a vulnerable adult. It shall be an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this subsection that the sexual activity was consensual between the vulnerable adult and a caregiver who was hired, supervised, and directed by the vulnerable adult. A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned for not more than two years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

No person, whether or not the person has actual knowledge of the victim’s vulnerable status, shall engage in sexual activity with a vulnerable adult if:

the vulnerable adult does not consent to the sexual activity; or

the person knows or should know that the vulnerable adult is incapable of resisting, declining, or consenting to the sexual activity due to his or her specific vulnerability or due to fear of retribution or hardship.

A person who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be:

imprisoned for not more than five years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, if the sexual activity involves lewd and lascivious conduct;

imprisoned for not more than 20 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, if the sexual activity involves a sexual act.

A caregiver who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be:

imprisoned for not more than seven years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, if the sexual activity involves lewd and lascivious conduct.

imprisoned for not more than 25 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, if the sexual activity involves a sexual act.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 79, § 2.

§ 1380.
Financial exploitation.

No person shall willfully use, withhold, transfer, or dispose of funds or property of a vulnerable adult, without or in excess of legal authority, for wrongful profit or advantage. No person shall willfully acquire possession or control of or an interest in funds or property of a vulnerable adult through the use of undue influence, harassment, duress, or fraud.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section, and exploits money, funds, or property of no more than $500.00 in value, shall be imprisoned not more than 18 months or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section, and exploits money, funds, or property in excess of $500.00 in value, shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 79, § 2.

§ 1381.
Exploitation of services.

Any person who willfully forces or compels a vulnerable adult against his or her will to perform services for the profit or advantage of another shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 79, § 2.

§ 1382.
Deferred sentence.

Notwithstanding the limitation of subsection 7041(a) of this title, a court may, on the motion of a party or on its own motion, with or without the consent of the State’s Attorney, defer sentencing for a misdemeanor violation of this chapter and place the defendant on probation upon such terms and conditions as it may require.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 79, § 2.

§ 1383.
Adult Abuse Registry.

A person who is convicted of a crime under this chapter shall be placed on the Adult Abuse Registry. A deferred sentence is considered a conviction for purposes of the Adult Abuse Registry.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 79, § 2.

§ 1384.
Civil action; recovery by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may bring an action for damages on behalf of the State against a person or caregiver who, with reckless disregard or with knowledge, violates section 1376 (abuse of a vulnerable adult), 1377 (abuse by unlawful restraint or confinement), 1378 (neglect of a vulnerable adult), 1380 (financial exploitation), or 1381 (exploitation of services) of this title, in addition to any other remedies provided by law, not to exceed the following:

$5,000.00 if no bodily injury results;

$10,000.00 if bodily injury results;

$20,000.00 if serious bodily injury results; and

$50,000.00 if death results.

In a civil action brought under this section, the defendant shall have a right to a jury trial.

A good faith report of abuse, neglect, exploitation, or suspicion thereof pursuant to 33 V.S.A. § 6902 or federal law shall not alone be sufficient evidence that a person acted in reckless disregard for purposes of subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added 2011, No. 141 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1385.
Civil investigation.

If the Attorney General has reason to believe a person or caregiver has violated section 1376, 1377, 1378, 1380, or 1381 of this title or an administrative rule adopted pursuant to those sections, he or she may:
(a) (1) If the Attorney General has reason to believe a person or caregiver has violated section 1376, 1377, 1378, 1380, or 1381 of this title or an administrative rule adopted pursuant to those sections, he or she may:

examine or cause to be examined any books, records, papers, memoranda, and physical objects of whatever nature bearing upon each alleged violation;

demand written responses under oath to questions bearing upon each alleged violation;

require the attendance of such person or of any other person having knowledge on the premises in the county where such person resides or has a place of business or in Washington County if such person is a nonresident or has no place of business within the State; and

take testimony and require proof material for his or her information and administer oaths or take acknowledgment in respect of any book, record, paper, or memorandum.

The Attorney General shall serve notice of the time, place, and cause of such examination or attendance or notice of the cause of the demand for written responses at least ten days prior to the date of such examination, personally or by certified mail, upon such person at his or her principal place of business or, if such place is not known, to his or her last known address. Any book, record, paper, memorandum, or other information produced by any person pursuant to this section shall not, unless otherwise ordered by a court of this State for good cause shown, be disclosed to any person other than the authorized agent or representative of the Attorney General or another law enforcement officer engaged in legitimate law enforcement activities unless with the consent of the person producing the same. This subsection shall not apply to any criminal investigation or prosecution.

A person upon whom a notice is served pursuant to this section shall comply with the terms thereof unless otherwise provided by the court order. Any person who, with intent to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance, in whole or in part, with any civil investigation under this section, removes from any place, conceals, withholds, or destroys, mutilates, alters, or by any other means falsifies any documentary material in the possession, custody, or control of any person subject of any such notice or mistakes or conceals any information shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than $5,000.00.

If a person fails to comply with a notice served pursuant to subsection (b) of this section or if satisfactory copying or reproduction of any such material cannot be done and such person refuses to surrender such material, the Attorney General may file a petition with the Civil Division of the Superior Court for enforcement of this section. Whenever any petition is filed under this section, the court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the matter presented and to enter such orders as may be required to effectuate the provisions of this section. Failure to comply with an order issued pursuant to this section shall be punished as contempt.

HISTORY:

Added 2011, No. 141 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1386.
Employment agreements.

In accordance with 21 V.S.A. § 306, it is the policy of the State of Vermont that no confidential employment separation agreement shall inhibit the disclosure to prospective employers and responsible licensing entities of factual information about a prospective employee’s background that would lead a reasonable person to conclude that the prospective employee has engaged in conduct jeopardizing the safety of a vulnerable adult or minor.

HISTORY:

Added 2018, No. 5 (Sp. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 19, 2018.